North Dakota, session 69, SB2052.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-66-13. Restriction on lobbying by elected public officials - Penalty.
A knowing violation of subsection 2 of section 2 of article XIV of the Constitution of North
Dakota is a class A misdemeanor. The ethics commission shall assess a civil penalty of up to
one thousand dollars on any individual who knowingly violates the subsection.
Page No. 1 25.8024.01000